Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1287.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 304(d)(1) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 304. Special Tax Provisions for Poverty.--* * *(d) Any claim for special tax provisions hereunder shall be determined in accordance with the following:(1) If the poverty income of the claimant during an entire taxable year is [six thousand five hundred dollars ($6,500)] ten 123456789101112131415161718192021 thousand dollars ($10,000) or less, or, in the case of a married claimant, if the joint poverty income of the claimant and the claimant's spouse during an entire taxable year is [thirteen thousand dollars ($13,000)] twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or less, the claimant shall be entitled to a refund or forgiveness of any moneys which have been paid over to (or would except for the provisions of this act be payable to) the Commonwealth under the provisions of this article, with an additional income allowance of nine thousand five hundred dollars ($9,500) for each dependent of the claimant. For purposes of this subsection, a claimant shall not be considered to be married if:(i) The claimant and the claimant's spouse file separate returns; and(ii) The claimant and the claimant's spouse live apart at all times during the last six months of the taxable year or are separated pursuant to a written separation agreement.* * *(4) For the tax year immediately following the effective date of this clause and for every tax year thereafter, the poverty income amounts under clause (1) for a claimant and for a claimant and the claimant's spouse shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by applying the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area, for the most recent twelve-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, to the then current poverty income amounts for a claimant and for a claimant and the claimant's spouse . The department shall 20250HB1287PN1463 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determine the percentage increase and the new poverty income amounts for a claimant and for a claimant and the claimant's spouse prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment and shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin within ten days of the date the determination is made. The poverty income amounts for a claimant and for a claimant and the claimant's spouse may not be decreased as a result of a negative percentage change in the CPI-U for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1287PN1463 - 3 - 1234567891011